Colorado, session 2026A, HB1100.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 15-14-103 as
follows:
15-14-103. Guardianship bill of rights.
(1) A WARD HAS THE RIGHT TO:
(a) BE TREATED WITH DIGNITY AND RESPECT;
(b) BE FREE FROM ABUSE, NEGLECT, EXPLOITATION, AND
DISCRIMINATION;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) REMAIN AS INDEPENDENT AS POSSIBLE;
(d) EXPRESS AND PRACTICE THEIR OWN RELIGIOUS PREFERENCES;
(e) PERSONAL PRIVACY;
(f) HUMANE, SAFE, AND SANITARY LIVING, LEARNING, AND WORKING
ENVIRONMENTS;
(g) SEXUAL EXPRESSION AND RESPECT FOR THEIR GENDER IDENTITY;
(h) A COMPETENT GUARDIAN WHO ADVOCATES FOR THEIR GOALS,
NEEDS, AND PREFERENCES AND PRIORITIZES THEIR DESIRES, INCLUDING
MEDICAL TREATMENT PREFERENCES, CULTURAL PRACTICES, AND RELIGIOUS
BELIEFS;
(i) PARTICIPATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, IN ALL DECISIONS,
ESPECIALLY THOSE AFFECTING THEIR CARE, WHERE THEY LIVE, THEIR
ACTIVITIES, AND THEIR SOCIAL INTERACTIONS, TO THE EXTENT THEY WISH
TO BE INVOLVED AND ARE ABLE TO BE INVOLVED;
(j) RECEIVE NECESSARY SERVICES AND REHABILITATION, WITHIN
AVAILABLE RESOURCES, THAT PROTECT THEIR PERSONAL LIBERTY AND ARE
PROVIDED WITH THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE CONDITIONS;
(k) PRUDENT MANAGEMENT OF THEIR RESOURCES BY THEIR
GUARDIAN;
(l) PARTICIPATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, IN DECISIONS ABOUT HOW
THEIR PROPERTY IS MANAGED, TO THE EXTENT THEY WISH TO BE INVOLVED
AND ARE ABLE TO BE INVOLVED;
(m) CONFIDENTIALITY FOR THOSE MATTERS THAT THEY WISH TO
KEEP CONFIDENTIAL, UNLESS THE INFORMATION IS NECESSARY TO OBTAIN
SERVICES; TO PREVENT ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR EXPLOITATION; OR TO MODIFY
THE GUARDIANSHIP ORDER OR OTHER ORDERS ENTERED PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 14 OR ARTICLE 14.5 OF THIS TITLE 15;
(n) MAINTAIN ALL RIGHTS THAT THE COURT HAS NOT GRANTED TO
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1100

THEIR GUARDIAN;
(o) A LAWYER WHO ADVOCATES FOR THE OUTCOME THE WARD
WANTS;
(p) BE PRESENT AND PARTICIPATE IN ALL COURT HEARINGS;
(q) SHARE CONCERNS OR COMPLAINTS ABOUT THEIR GUARDIANSHIP
WITH THE COURT;
(r) ASK THE COURT TO REVIEW THE NEED FOR THEIR GUARDIANSHIP
TO CHANGE, CONTINUE, OR END AND WHETHER THEIR GUARDIAN IS AN
APPROPRIATE FIT FOR THEM;
(s) IF A QUESTION ARISES ABOUT THEIR CAPACITY TO EXERCISE A
SPECIFIC RIGHT, HAVE A COURT REVIEW AND DETERMINE IF AN EVALUATION
IS NECESSARY IN ORDER TO DETERMINE THEIR CAPACITY TO EXERCISE THE
RIGHT;
(t) THE SUPPORT AND ACCOMMODATIONS THEY NEED TO BE ABLE TO
EFFECTIVELY COMMUNICATE WITH THE COURT AND TO UNDERSTAND THE
COURT PROCEEDINGS; AND
(u) HAVE THEIR RIGHTS EXPLAINED TO THEM IN THEIR PREFERRED
METHOD OF COMMUNICATION AND IN THE LANGUAGE THEY CHOOSE.
(2) THE COURT MAY AUTHORIZE A GUARDIAN TO MAKE DECISIONS
FOR THE FOLLOWING RIGHTS ON BEHALF OF THE WARD:
(a) TO DETERMINE THE WARD'S SOCIAL ENVIRONMENT AND THE
SOCIAL ASPECTS OF THEIR PERSONAL LIFE;
(b) TO FILE AND DEFEND LAWSUITS;
(c) TO MAKE CONTRACTS;
(d) TO MAKE GIFTS OF THE WARD'S MONEY; AND
(e) TO MANAGE THE WARD'S MONEY AND PROPERTY.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1100

(3) THE WARD RETAINS THE RIGHT TO VOTE, TO MAINTAIN THEIR
REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH AND ABILITY TO PROCREATE, AND TO CHANGE THEIR
MARITAL STATUS, UNLESS THE COURT RESTRICTS THOSE RIGHTS BY STATING
THE RESTRICTIONS AND THE RELEVANT FINDINGS TO SUPPORT THE
RESTRICTIONS IN THE ORDER APPOINTING THE GUARDIAN.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ALTERS, LIMITS, OR AFFECTS THE
COURT'S AUTHORITY OR THE STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR APPOINTING
A GUARDIAN, DETERMINING THE SCOPE OF GUARDIANSHIP, OR MODIFYING OR
TERMINATING A GUARDIANSHIP PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 14 OR ARTICLE
14.5 OF THIS TITLE 15. THE RIGHTS SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION ARE SUBJECT
TO ANY LIMITATIONS IMPOSED BY COURT ORDER.
(5) THIS SECTION DOES NOT CREATE A NEW CAUSE OF ACTION OR
AFFECT ANY EXISTING CAUSE OF ACTION OR REMEDY AVAILABLE TO A WARD.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-3-101, add (19) as
follows:
13-3-101. State court administrator - duties - report - definitions
- repeal.
(19) (a) ON NOVEMBER 1, 2027, AND NOVEMBER 1, 2028, THE STATE
COURT ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE JOINT
BUDGET COMMITTEE, THE SENATE JUDICIARY COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES JUDICIARY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEES, DETAILING THE FISCAL IMPACT OF HOUSE BILL 26-1100 ON
THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT. THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE
SHALL USE EXISTING DATA SOURCES TO CREATE THE REPORT REQUIRED BY
THIS SECTION.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (19) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2029.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 15-14-314, amend
(2)(f) and (2)(g); and add (2)(h) as follows:
15-14-314. Duties of guardian.
(2) A guardian shall:
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1100

(f) Inform the court of any A change in the ward's custodial dwelling
or address; and
(g) Immediately notify the court in writing of the ward's death; AND
(h) NOTIFY, TO THE EXTENT REASONABLY FEASIBLE, THE WARD, AT
LEAST THIRTY DAYS BEFORE A CHANGE, IF POSSIBLE, AT THE WARD'S
PRIMARY DWELLING, OF A FORTHCOMING PERMANENT MOVE TO A NURSING
HOME, MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTION, OR OTHER FACILITY THAT PLACES
RESTRICTIONS ON THE WARD'S ABILITY TO LEAVE THE FACILITY OR HAVE
VISITORS, UNLESS THE CHANGE OR MOVE IS PROPOSED IN THE GUARDIAN'S
PLAN OR AUTHORIZED BY THE COURT BY SPECIFIC ORDER.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1100

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1100